Utah statutes.
62A-15-1101.   Suicide prevention program -- Reporting requirements.

(1)  As used in the section:

(a)  "Division" means the State Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health.

(b)  "Intervention" means an effort to prevent a person from attempting suicide.

(c)  "Postvention" means mental health intervention after a suicide attempt or death to prevent or contain contagion.

(d)  "State suicide prevention coordinator" means a person designated by the division as described in Subsection (2).

(2)  The division shall appoint a state suicide prevention coordinator.

(3)  The state suicide prevention coordinator shall coordinate suicide prevention, intervention, and postvention programs, services, and efforts statewide, with at least the following:

(a)  local mental health and substance abuse authorities;

(b)  the State Board of Education, including the State Office of Education suicide prevention coordinator described in Section 53A-15-1301;

(c)  the Department of Health;

(d)  health care providers, including emergency rooms; and

(e)  other public health suicide prevention efforts.

(4)  The state suicide prevention coordinator shall report to the Legislature's Education Interim Committee, by the November 2014 meeting, jointly with the State Board of Education, on the coordination of suicide prevention programs and efforts with the State Board of Education and the State Office of Education suicide prevention coordinator as described in Section 53A-15-1301.



Enacted by Chapter 194, 2013 General Session

